Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.010

Finding.

The legislature finds that the creation of a forest products commission would assist in expanding the state's economy, because:

(1) Marketing is a dynamic and changing part of the Washington forest products industry and a vital element in expanding the state economy;

(2) The sale in the state and export to other states and abroad of forest products made in the state contribute substantial benefits to the economy of the state, provide a large number of jobs and sizeable tax revenues, and are key components of the health of many local communities because many secondary businesses are largely dependent on the health of the forest products industry; and

(3) Forest products are made from a renewable resource and are more environmentally sound than many alternative products.

[ 2001 c 314 s 1.]